Hawaii statutes.
§383-171 Weekly extended benefit amount.
The weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual for a week of total
unemployment in the individual's eligibility period shall be an amount equal to
the weekly benefit amount payable to the individual during the individual's
applicable benefit year. For any individual who was paid benefits during the
applicable benefit year in accordance with more than one weekly benefit amount,
the weekly extended benefit amount shall be the average of such weekly benefit
amounts. [L 1971, c 187, pt of §13; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next